California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Any communication regarding a time-share interest that is addressed to any person who has previously executed a contract for the sale or purchase of that time-share interest and that does not constitute a solicitation of a time-share interest, shall be exempt from this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11218.

A time-share interest in a time-share plan shall be deemed an interest in subdivided lands or a subdivision for purposes of subdivision (f) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11219.

(a) Time-share plans registered as Qualified Resort Vacation Club Projects under prior law shall continue to operate under that prior law notwithstanding anything in this chapter to the contrary.

(b) (1) All registrations of time-share plans in effect on the effective date of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect and shall be considered registered pursuant to
 this chapter.

(2) All time-share plans included in this subdivision are subject to Sections 11217, 11219, 11238, 11239, 11245, 11250, and 11280 to 11286, inclusive, and shall be required to comply with the other provisions of this chapter at the time they seek amendment or renewal of their existing registrations. When an amendment or renewal of a time-share plan is filed with the commissioner, the existing registration continues in full force and effect while the amendment or renewal is pending before the commissioner.

(c) Any existing injunction or temporary restraining order validly obtained that prohibits unregistered practice of time-share developers, time-share plans, or their agents shall not be invalidated by the enactment of this chapter and shall continue to have full force and effect on and after the effective date of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration, Sale Requirements, and Fees [11225. - 11246.]

11225.

A person shall not be required to register a time-share plan with the commissioner pursuant to this chapter if any of the following applies:

(a) The person is an owner of a time-share interest who has acquired the time-share interest for the person’s own use and occupancy and who later offers it for resale.

(b) The person is a managing entity or an association that is not otherwise a developer of a time-share plan in its own right, solely while acting as an association or under a contract with an association to offer or sell a time-share interest transferred to the association through foreclosure, deed in lieu of foreclosure, or gratuitous
 transfer, if these acts are performed in the regular course of, or as an incident to, the management of the association for its own account in the time-share plan. Notwithstanding the exemption from registration, the association or managing entity shall provide each purchaser of a time-share interest covered by this subdivision a copy of the time-share instruments, a copy of the then-current budget, a written statement of the then-current assessment amounts, and shall provide the purchaser the opportunity to rescind the purchase within seven days after receipt of these documents. Immediately prior to the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the purchaser, the association or managing entity shall disclose, in conspicuous type, substantially the following notice of cancellation:

YOU
 MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHOUT ANY PENALTY OR OBLIGATION WITHIN SEVEN CALENDAR DAYS OF RECEIPT OF THE PUBLIC REPORT OR AFTER THE DATE YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT, WHICHEVER DATE IS LATER. IF YOU DECIDE TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT, YOU MUST NOTIFY THE ASSOCIATION (OR MANAGING ENTITY) IN WRITING OF YOUR INTENT TO CANCEL. YOUR NOTICE OF CANCELLATION SHALL BE EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE SENT AND SHALL BE SENT TO (NAME OF ASSOCIATION OR MANAGING ENTITY) AT (ADDRESS OF ASSOCIATION OR MANAGING ENTITY). YOUR NOTICE OF CANCELLATION MAY ALSO BE SENT BY FACSIMILE TO (FACSIMILE NUMBER OF THE ASSOCIATION OR MANAGING ENTITY) OR BY HAND-DELIVERY. ANY ATTEMPT TO OBTAIN A WAIVER OF YOUR CANCELLATION RIGHT IS VOID AND OF NO EFFECT.

(c) The person is conveyed, assigned, or transferred more than
 seven time-share interests from a developer in a single voluntary or involuntary transaction and subsequently conveys, assigns, or transfers all of the time-share interests received from the developer to a single purchaser in a single transaction.

(d) (1) The developer is offering or disposing of a time-share interest to a purchaser who has previously acquired a time-share interest from the same developer if the developer has a time-share plan registered under this chapter, which was originally approved by the commissioner within the preceding seven years, and the developer complies in all respects with the provisions of Section 11245, and, further, provides the purchaser with (A) a cancellation period of at least seven days, (B) all the time-share disclosure documents that are required to be provided to purchasers as if
 the sale occurred in the state or jurisdiction where the time-share property is located, and (C) the following disclaimer in conspicuous type:

WARNING: THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF REAL ESTATE HAS NOT EXAMINED THIS OFFERING, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE CONDITION OF TITLE, THE STATUS OF BLANKET LIENS ON THE PROJECT (IF ANY), ARRANGEMENTS TO ASSURE PROJECT COMPLETION, ESCROW PRACTICES, CONTROL OVER PROJECT MANAGEMENT, RACIALLY DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES (IF ANY), TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND PRICE OF THE OFFER, CONTROL OVER ANNUAL ASSESSMENTS (IF ANY), OR THE AVAILABILITY OF WATER, SERVICES, UTILITIES, OR IMPROVEMENTS. IT MAY BE ADVISABLE FOR YOU TO CONSULT AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER KNOWLEDGEABLE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS FAMILIAR WITH REAL ESTATE AND DEVELOPMENT LAW IN THE STATE
 WHERE THIS TIME-SHARE PROPERTY IS SITUATED.

(2) By making that offering or disposition, the person is deemed to consent to the jurisdiction of the commissioner in the event of a dispute with the purchaser in connection with the offering or disposition.

(e) It is a single site time-share plan located outside of the boundaries of the United States or component site of a specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan located wholly outside of the boundaries of the United States, or a nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plan in which all component sites are located wholly outside of the boundaries of the United States. However, it is unlawful and a violation of this chapter for a person, in this state,
 to sell or lease or offer for sale or lease a time-share interest in a time-share plan, located outside the United States, unless the printed material, literature, advertising, or invitation in this state relating to that sale, lease, or offer clearly and conspicuously contains the following disclaimer in capital letters of at least 10-point type:

 WARNING: THE CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF REAL ESTATE HAS NOT EXAMINED THIS OFFERING, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE CONDITION OF TITLE, THE STATUS OF BLANKET LIENS ON THE PROJECT (IF ANY), ARRANGEMENTS TO ASSURE PROJECT COMPLETION, ESCROW PRACTICES, CONTROL OVER PROJECT MANAGEMENT, RACIALLY DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES (IF ANY), TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND PRICE OF THE OFFER, CONTROL
 OVER ANNUAL ASSESSMENTS (IF ANY), OR THE AVAILABILITY OF WATER, SERVICES, UTILITIES, OR IMPROVEMENTS. IT MAY BE ADVISABLE FOR YOU TO CONSULT AN ATTORNEY OR OTHER KNOWLEDGEABLE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS FAMILIAR WITH REAL ESTATE AND DEVELOPMENT LAW IN THE COUNTRY WHERE THIS TIME-SHARE PROPERTY IS SITUATED.

(1) If an offer of time-share interest in a time-share plan described in this subdivision is not initially made in writing, the foregoing disclaimer shall be received by the offeree in writing prior to a visit to a location, sales presentation, or contact with a person representing the offeror, when the visit or contact was scheduled or arranged by the offeror or its representative. The deposit of the disclaimer in the United States mail, addressed to the offeree and
 with first-class postage prepaid, at least five days prior to the scheduled or arranged visit or contact, shall be deemed to constitute delivery for purposes of this section.

(2) If any California resident is presented with an agreement or purchase contract to lease or purchase a time-share interest as described in this subdivision, when an offer to lease or purchase that time-share interest was made to that resident in California, a copy of the disclaimer set forth in this subdivision shall be inserted in at least 10-point type at the top of the first page of that agreement or purchase contract and shall be initialed by that California resident.

(3) This subdivision shall not be deemed to exempt from registration in this state a nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share
 plan in which any component site in the time-share plan is located in the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 35.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.

(a) Any person who, to any individual located in the state, sells, offers to sell, or attempts to solicit prospective purchasers to purchase a time-share interest, or any person who creates a time-share plan with an accommodation in the state, shall register the time-share plan with the commissioner, unless the time-share plan is otherwise exempt under this chapter.

(b) A developer, or any of its agents, shall not sell, offer, or dispose of a time-share
 interest in the state unless all necessary registration requirements are provided and approved by the commissioner, or the sale, offer, or disposition is otherwise permitted by this chapter, or while an order revoking or suspending a registration is in effect.

(c) In registering a time-share plan, the developer shall provide the commissioner all of the following information:

(1) The developer’s legal name, any assumed names used by the developer, principal office street address, mailing address, primary contact person, and telephone number.

(2) The name of the developer’s authorized or registered agent in the state upon whom claims can be served or service of process be had, the agent’s street address in California, and telephone number.

(3) The name,
 street address, mailing address, primary contact person, and telephone number of the time-share plan being registered.

(4) The name, street address, mailing address, and telephone number of any managing entity of the time-share plan.

(5) A public report that complies with the requirements of Section 11234, or for a time-share plan located outside of the state, a public report that has been authorized for use by the situs state regulatory agency and that contains disclosures as determined by the commissioner upon review to be substantially equivalent to or greater than the information required to be disclosed pursuant to Section 11234.

(6) A description of the inventory control system that will ensure compliance with Section 11250.

(7) Any other
 information regarding the developer, time-share plan, or managing entities as established by regulation.

(d) An applicant for a public report for a time-share plan shall present evidence of the following for each accommodation in each time-share property that is, or will be, offered for sale in this state pursuant to the registration:

(1) That the accommodation is presently suitable for human occupancy or that financial arrangements have been made to complete construction or renovation of the accommodation to make it suitable for human occupancy on or before the first date for occupancy by a time-share interest owner.

(2) That the accommodation is owned or leased by the developer of the time-share plan or is the subject of an enforceable option or contract under which the developer will build, purchase, or lease the
 accommodation. Notwithstanding this subdivision, the developer shall present evidence prior to the receipt of a final public report that the accommodation to be sold is owned or leased by the developer and that the accommodation is free and clear of encumbrances in accordance with Sections 11244 and 11255.

(e) If an accommodation in a time-share plan is located within a local governmental jurisdiction or subdivision of real property in which the dedication of accommodations to time-sharing is expressly prohibited by ordinance or recorded restriction, either absolutely or without a permit or other entitlement from the governing body, the applicant for a public report shall present evidence of a permit or other entitlement by the appropriate authority for the local government or the subdivision.

(f) (1) The developer shall amend or supplement its disclosure
 documents and registration information, to reflect any material change in any information required by this chapter or the regulations implementing this chapter. The developer shall notify the commissioner of the material change prior to implementation of the change, unless the change is beyond the control of the developer; in which event, the developer shall provide written notice to the commissioner as soon as reasonably practicable after the occurrence of the event necessitating the change. All amendments, supplements, and facts relevant to the material change shall be filed with the commissioner within 20 calendar days of the material change.

(2) The developer may continue to sell time-share interests in the time-share plan so long as, prior to closing, the developer provides a notice to each purchaser that describes the material change and provides to each purchaser the previously approved public report.

(A) If the change is material and adverse to the purchaser, all purchaser funds shall be held in escrow, or pursuant to alternative assurances permitted by subdivision (c) of Section 11243, and no closing shall occur until the amendment relating to the material and adverse change has been approved by the commissioner. After the amendment relating to the material and adverse change has been approved and the amended public report has been issued, the amended public report shall be sent to the purchaser, and an additional seven-day rescission period shall commence. The developer shall be required to maintain evidence of the receipt by each purchaser of the amended public report.

(B) If the commissioner refuses to approve the amendment relating to the material and adverse change, all sales made using the notice shall be subject to rescission and all funds returned.

(3) The developer shall update the public report to reflect any changes to the time-share plan that are not material and adverse, including the addition of any component sites, within a reasonable time, and may continue to sell and close time-share interests prior to the date that the amended public report is approved.

(g) An applicant for a public report for a multisite, time-share plan consisting of specific time-share interests, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (z) of Section 11212, affiliated with sites operated through the time-share plan’s reservation system, shall certify both of the following:

(1) That a purchaser has, or will have, contractual or membership rights to use accommodations at each affiliated site and that, if an accommodation or promised improvement is, or may become,
 subject to a blanket encumbrance, that the blanket encumbrance is, or will be, subordinate to these rights.

(2) That a certificate of occupancy has been issued with respect to the accommodations at each affiliated site or that adequate provisions exist or will exist for the completion of all such accommodations. For any affiliated site accommodations that are not complete, the public report shall clearly identify in conspicuous type that those accommodations are not completed. For any accommodations that are not complete and for which adequate provisions for completion do not exist at the time the public report is issued, the public report shall also provide in conspicuous type that those accommodations might not be built, provided, however, that a developer’s failure to build the accommodations shall not relieve the developer of any obligations created by the certification made pursuant to this subdivision.

(h) For purposes of subdivision (d) of this section, the “time-share property being offered for sale in this state” shall mean the following:

(1) With respect to a single site time-share plan, the time-share property being registered pursuant to this chapter.

(2) With respect to a specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan, the specific time-share property being registered pursuant to this chapter.

(3) With respect to a nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plan, all time-share properties in the time-share plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 429, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.1.

Any person offering to sell or lease any interest subject to the requirements of Section 11226 shall make a copy of each of the following documents available for examination by a prospective purchaser or lessee before the execution of an offer to purchase or lease and shall give a copy of those documents to each purchaser or lessee as soon as practicable before transfer of the interest being acquired by the purchaser or lessee:

(a) The declaration of covenants, conditions,
 and restrictions for the time-share plan.

(b) Articles of incorporation or association for the time-share owners’ association.

(c) Bylaws of the owners’ association.

(d) Any other instrument that establishes or defines the common, mutual, and reciprocal rights and responsibilities of the owners or lessees of interest in the time-share plan as members of the owners’ association or otherwise.

(e) The current budget and financial statements for the time-share plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 429, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

11227.

(a) Subject to subdivision (h), the commissioner shall issue a final public report if all registration requirements have been met as set forth in this chapter and if all deficiencies and substantive inadequacies in the substantially complete application for a final public report for the time-share plan have been corrected.

(b) The commissioner may issue a conditional public report prior to
 issuing a final public report for a time-share plan if the requirements of subdivision (c) are met, all deficiencies and substantive inadequacies in the substantially complete application for a final public report for the time-share plan have been corrected, the material elements of the offering to be made under the authority of the conditional public report have been established, and all requirements for the issuance of the conditional public report have been met, except for one or more of the following requirements, as may be applicable:

(1) A final map has not been recorded.

(2) A condominium plan has not been recorded.

(3) A declaration of covenants, conditions, and restrictions has not been recorded.

(4) A declaration of annexation has not been
 recorded.

(5) A recorded subordination of existing liens to the time-share instruments or declaration of annexation or escrow instructions to effect recordation prior to the first sale, are lacking.

(6) Filed articles of incorporation are lacking.

(7) A current preliminary report of a licensed title insurance company issued after filing of the final map and recording of the time-share instrument covering all time-share interests to be included in the public report has not been provided.

(8) Other requirements the commissioner determines are likely to be timely satisfied by the applicant.

(c) An applicant for a conditional public report shall submit the following information and documents
 with the applicable filing fee:

(1) A copy of the statement set forth in subdivision (e).

(2) A sales agreement or lease to be used in any transaction conducted under authority of the conditional public report. The sales agreement or lease shall include all of the following provisions:

(A) No escrow will close, funds will not be released from escrow, and the interest contracted for will not be conveyed until a current final public report for the time-share plan is furnished to the purchaser.

(B) The contract may be rescinded, in which event the entire sum of money paid or advanced by the purchaser shall be returned if (i) a final public report has not been issued within six months after the date of issuance of the conditional public report if the
 conditional public report is not renewed, (ii) the final public report is not issued within 12 months after the initial conditional public report is received if the conditional public report has been renewed for an additional six-month period, or (iii) the purchaser or lessee is dissatisfied with the final public report because of a material and adverse change.

(3) Escrow instructions to be used in any transaction conducted under authority of the conditional public report that includes at least the following information:

(A) The name and address of the escrow depository.

(B) A description of the nature of the transaction.

(C) Provisions ensuring compliance with Section 11243.

(D) Provisions ensuring that no escrow will close, funds will not be released from escrow, and the interest contracted for will not be conveyed until a current final public report for the time-share plan is furnished to the purchaser or lessee.

(E) Provisions for the return of money as prescribed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(d) A decision by the commissioner to not issue a conditional public report shall be noticed in writing to the applicant within five business days after his or her decision and that notice shall specifically state the reasons why the report is not being issued.

(e) A person may sell or lease, or offer for sale or lease, time-share interests in a time-share plan pursuant to a conditional public report if, as a condition of the sale or lease or offer for sale or lease,
 delivery of legal title or other interest contracted for will not take place until issuance of a final public report and provided that the requirements of subdivision (c) are met.

(f) A developer, principal, or his or her agent shall provide a prospective purchaser a copy of the conditional public report and a written statement including all of the following information:

(1) Specification of the information required for issuance of a final public report.

(2) Specification of the information required in the final public report that is not available in the conditional public report, along with a statement of the reasons why that information is not available at the time of issuance of the conditional public report.

(3) A statement that no person acting as
 a principal or agent shall sell or lease, or offer for sale or lease, time-share interests in a time-share plan for which a conditional public report has been issued except as provided in this chapter.

(4) Specification of the requirements of subdivision (e).

(g) The prospective purchaser shall sign a receipt that he or she has received and has read the conditional public report and the written statement provided pursuant to subdivision (f).

(h) The term of a conditional public report may not exceed six months unless renewed pursuant to this subdivision. The conditional public report may be renewed for one additional six-month period if the commissioner determines that the requirements for issuance of a final public report are likely to be satisfied during the renewal term. The renewal of a conditional public report
 shall not act to afford a purchaser who received the initial conditional public report any additional rescission rights other than those provided to a purchaser when a final public report is issued and a material and adverse change has been made.

(i) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state, a disclosure document that has been authorized for use by the state regulatory agency in the state in which the time-share plan or component site is located that contains the disclosures as determined by the commissioner upon review to be substantially equivalent to or greater than the information required to be disclosed pursuant to Section 11234, shall be accepted in lieu of a public report required pursuant to this section. The disclosure document shall contain a cover page issued by the commissioner certifying the approval of its use in lieu of the public report required herein.

(j) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the commissioner may grant a 12-month preliminary public report allowing the developer to begin offering and selling time-share interests, in a time-share plan regardless of whether the accommodations of the time-share plan are located within or outside of the state, while the registration is pending with the commissioner. The commissioner may grant one additional 12-month period if the developer is actively and diligently pursuing registration under this chapter. The preliminary public report shall automatically terminate with respect to those time-share interests covered by a final public report that is issued before the scheduled termination date of the preliminary report. To obtain a preliminary public report, the developer shall provide all of the following:

(1) Submit the reservation instrument to be used in a form
 previously approved by the department with at least the following provisions:

(A) The right of both the developer and the potential purchaser to unilaterally cancel the reservation at any time.

(B) The payment to the potential purchaser of his or her total deposit following cancellation of the reservation by either party.

(C) The placing of the deposit into an interest bearing escrow account.

(2) Agree to provide each potential purchaser with a copy of the preliminary public report and an executed receipt for a copy before any money or other thing of value has been accepted by or on behalf of the developer in connection with the reservation.

(3) Agree to provide a copy of the reservation
 instrument signed by the potential purchaser and by or on behalf of the developer to the potential purchaser, and place any deposit taken from the potential purchaser into a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11228.

The term of a final public report shall be limited to five years. A renewal shall be issued if the developer, owner, or agent makes application for renewal of any report and has submitted the additional information that the commissioner may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11229.

(a) In connection with its review of the registration application of a time-share plan, the commissioner may make an examination of any time-share property submitted for registration pursuant to this chapter, and shall, unless there are grounds for denial, issue to the developer a public report authorizing the sale or lease in this state of the time-share interests within the time-share plan submitted pursuant to this chapter. The report shall contain the
 data obtained in accordance with Section 11234.

(b) The commissioner may deny the issuance of the public report based on the applicant’s failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the commissioner pertaining thereto, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The sale or lease would constitute misrepresentation to, or deceit or fraud of, the purchasers or lessees.

(2) Inability to deliver title or other interest contracted for.

(3) Inability to demonstrate, in accordance with this chapter, that adequate financial arrangements have been made for all offsite improvements included in the offering.

(4) Inability to demonstrate, in
 accordance with this chapter, that adequate financial arrangements have been made for any community, recreational, or other facilities included in the offering.

(5) Failure to make a showing that the parcels can be used for the purpose for which they are offered.

(6) Failure to provide in the contract or other writing the use or uses for which the parcels are offered, together with any covenants or conditions relative thereto.

(c) Any developer objecting to the denial of a public report may, within 30 days after receipt of the order of denial, file a written request for a hearing. The commissioner shall hold the hearing within 20 days thereafter unless the party requesting the hearing requests a postponement. If the hearing is not held within 20 days after request for a hearing is received plus the period of the
 postponement or if a proposed decision is not rendered within 45 days after submission and an order adopting or rejecting the proposed decision is not issued within 15 days thereafter, the order of denial shall be rescinded and a public report issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11230.

If the time-share plan, including any accommodations, or amenities within the common area are not completed prior to the issuance of a final public report for the time-share plan, the developer shall specify a reasonable date for completion and shall comply with any one of the following conditions:

(a) Arranges for lien and completion bond or bonds, enforceable by the association, in an amount and subject to the
 terms, conditions, and coverage necessary to assure completion of the improvements lien-free. The bond shall not exceed 120 percent of the cost for completion, and the bond shall provide for the reduction of the bond amount as work is completed.

(b) All funds from the sale of time-share interests as the commissioner shall determine are sufficient to assure construction of the improvement or improvements shall be bonded or impounded in a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner until the improvements have been completed and all applicable lien periods have expired.

(c) An amount sufficient to cover the costs of construction shall be deposited in a neutral escrow depository acceptable to the commissioner under a written escrow agreement providing for disbursements from the escrow as work is completed.

(d) An alternative plan that may be approved by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11231.

Every registration required to be filed with the commissioner under this chapter shall be reviewed and issued the specified public report in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) Time-share registration. Registration shall be effective only upon the issuance of a public report by the commissioner that shall occur no later than 60 calendar days after the actual receipt by the commissioner of the properly
 completed application. The commissioner shall provide a list of deficiencies in the application, if any, within 60 calendar days of receipt. This same time period applies when amending a public report to add additional phases or component sites of the time-share plan.

(b) Preliminary public report registration. A preliminary public report shall be issued within 15 calendar days of receipt, unless the commissioner provides to the applicant a written list of deficiencies in the application, if any, within 15 calendar days of receipt of an application.

(c) Amended public report where no additional phases or component sites are added. An effective date for an amendment to a public report should occur no more than 45 calendar days after actual receipt by the commissioner of the amendment. The commissioner shall provide a list of deficiencies regarding the amendments, if any, within 45
 calendar days of receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11232.

(a) The commissioner may by regulation prescribe filing fees in connection with applications to the Department of Real Estate for a public report pursuant to the provisions of this chapter that are lower than the maximum fees specified in subdivision (b) if the commissioner determines that the lower fees are sufficient to offset the costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this chapter. The commissioner shall hold at least one hearing each calendar year to determine if lower fees than those specified in subdivision (b) should be prescribed. At this hearing, the department shall report on the financial status of the department, including the revenues, expenditures, and reserves as of the end of the previous fiscal year. The department shall post a hearing notice 15 days in advance of the hearing that includes the
 required information about the financial status of the department.

(b) The filing fees for an application for a public report to be issued under authority of this chapter shall be set at the amount prescribed below and shall not exceed the maximum specified for each time-share plan, location, or phase of the time-share plan in which interests are to be offered for sale or lease:

(1) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), not to exceed three thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($3,250), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each time-share interest to be offered for an original public report application.

(2) One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), not to exceed one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars ($1,950), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for
 each time-share plan interest to be offered that was not permitted to be offered under the public report to be renewed for a renewal public report or permit application.

(3) One thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), not to exceed one thousand nine hundred fifty dollars ($1,950), plus fifteen dollars ($15), not to exceed twenty dollars ($20), for each time-share interest to be offered under the amended public report for which a fee has not previously been paid for an amended public report application.

(4) One thousand dollars ($1,000), not to exceed one thousand three hundred dollars ($1,300), for a conditional public report application.

(5) Five hundred dollars ($500), not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650), for a preliminary public report application.

(c) Fees collected by the commissioner under authority of this chapter shall be deposited into the Real Estate Fund pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10450) of Part 1. Fees received by the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be deemed earned upon receipt. A fee is not refundable unless the commissioner determines that it was paid as a result of mistake or inadvertency. This section shall remain in effect unless it is superseded pursuant to Section 10226 or subdivision (a) of Section 10226.5, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 18.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11233.

An applicant for a public report for a time-share plan in which the use and occupancy of the time-share interest purchased in the time-share plan is determined according to a point system shall include in the application the following information:

(a) Whether additional points may be acquired by purchase or otherwise, in the future and the manner in which future purchases of points may be made.

(b) The transferability of points to other persons, other years or other time-share plans.

(c) A copy of the then-current point value use directory, along with rules and procedures for changes by the developer or the association in the manner in which point values may be used.

(1) No change exceeding 10 percent per annum in the manner in which point values may be used may be made without the assent of at least 25 percent of the voting power of the association other than the developer.

(2) No time-share interest owner shall be prevented from using a time-share plan as a result of changes in the manner in which point values may be used.

(3) In the event point values are changed or adjusted, no
 time-share owner shall be prevented from using his or her home resort in the same manner as was provided for under the original purchase contract.

(d) Any limitations or restrictions upon the use of point values.

(e) A description of an inventory control system that will ensure compliance with Section 11250.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11234.

A developer shall prepare, for issuance by the commissioner, a public report that shall fully and accurately disclose those facts concerning the time-share developer and time-share plan that are required by this chapter or by regulation. The developer shall provide the public report to each purchaser of a time-share interest in a time-share plan at the time of purchase. The public report shall be in writing or in a digital format
 at the discretion of the purchaser and dated and shall require the purchaser to certify in writing the receipt thereof. The public report for a single site time-share plan is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a). The public report for a specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan is subject to the requirements of both subdivisions (a) and (b). The public report for a nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plan is subject to the requirements of subdivision (c). For time-share plans located outside of the state, a public report that has been authorized for use by the situs state regulatory agency and that contains disclosures as determined by the commissioner upon review to be substantially equivalent to or greater than the information required to be disclosed pursuant to this section may be used by the developer to meet the requirements of this section. A developer may, upon approval by the commissioner, submit a public report that combines, in a manner prescribed by the
 commissioner, the information required to be disclosed by the applicable subdivisions of this section and the information required to be disclosed in a public report issued by a regulatory agency in one or more other states.

(a) Public reports for a single site and those component sites of a specific time-share interest multisite time-share plan that are offered in this state shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the developer and the type of time-share plan being offered and the name and address of the time-share project.
